Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1623.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1272, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1272.
UNLAWFUL CARRY
A. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, it shall be
unlawful for any person to carry upon or about his or her person, or
in a purse or other container belonging to the person, any pistol,
revolver, shotgun or rifle whether loaded or unloaded or any
blackjack, loaded cane, hand chain, metal knuckles, or any other
offensive weapon, whether such weapon be concealed or unconcealed,
except this section shall not prohibit:

Req. No. 10032 Page 1

1. The proper use of guns and knives for self-defense, hunting,
fishing, educational or recreational purposes;
2. The carrying or use of weapons in a manner otherwise
permitted by statute or authorized by the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act;
3. The carrying, possession and use of any weapon by a peace
officer or other person authorized by law to carry a weapon in the
performance of official duties and in compliance with the rules of
the employing agency;
4. The carrying or use of weapons in a courthouse by a district
judge, associate district judge or special district judge within
this state, who is in possession of a valid handgun license issued
pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act and
whose name appears on a list maintained by the Administrative
Director of the Courts;
5. The carrying and use of firearms and other weapons provided
in this subsection when used for the purpose of living history
reenactment. For purposes of this paragraph, "living history
reenactment" means depiction of historical characters, scenes,
historical life or events for entertainment, education, or
historical documentation through the wearing or use of period,
historical, antique or vintage clothing, accessories, firearms,
weapons, and other implements of the historical period; or
6. The transporting by vehicle on a public roadway or the
carrying of a firearm, concealed or unconcealed, loaded or unloaded,
Req. No. 10032 Page 2

by a person who is twenty-one (21) years of age or older or by a
person who is eighteen (18) years of age but not yet twenty-one (21)
years of age and the person is a member or veteran of the United
States Armed Forces, Reserves or National Guard or was discharged
under honorable conditions from the United States Armed Forces,
Reserves or National Guard, and the person is otherwise not
disqualified from the possession or purchase of a firearm under
state or federal law and is not carrying the firearm in furtherance
of a crime; or
7. The transporting by vehicle on a public roadway a loaded
rifle by a person who has been issued a license to carry a concealed
or unconcealed handgun as provided by the provisions of the Oklahoma
Self-Defense Act.
Except as provided in subsection B of Section 1283 of this
title, a person who has been convicted of any one of the following
offenses in this state or a violation of the equivalent law of
another state:
a. assault and battery pursuant to the provisions of
Section 644 of this title which caused serious
physical injury to the victim,
b. aggravated assault and battery pursuant to the
provisions of Section 646 of this title,
c. assault and battery that qualifies as domestic abuse
as defined in Section 644 of this title,
Req. No. 10032 Page 3

d. stalking pursuant to the provisions of Section 1173 of
this title,
e. a violation of an order issued under the Protection
from Domestic Abuse Act or a domestic abuse protection
order issued by another state, or
f. a violation relating to illegal drug use or possession
under the provisions of the Uniform Controlled
Dangerous Substances Act,
shall be prohibited from carrying a firearm under the provisions of
this paragraph. Any person who carries a firearm in the manner
provided for in this paragraph shall be prohibited from carrying the
firearm into any of the places prohibited in subsection A of Section
1277 of this title or any other place currently prohibited by law.
Nothing in this section shall modify or otherwise change where a
person may legally carry a firearm.
B. Any person convicted of violating the foregoing provision
shall be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable as provided in Section
1276 of this title.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-10032 GRS 01/02/24



Req. No. 10032 Page 4